Utah statutes.
13-10b-302.   Immunity of owner or employee who contacts law enforcement.
The owner or employee of a motion picture theater who advises a law
enforcement agency of an alleged violation of this section is not liable in
any civil action that arises out of detaining an individual under Section
13-10b-301 whom the owner or employee reasonably believes to have violated
Section 13-10b-201, unless the plaintiff shows by clear and convincing
evidence that the measures were manifestly unreasonable or the period of
detention was unreasonably long.
